Maine, session 132, LD1051.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §1893, sub-§2, ¶A, as repealed and replaced by PL 2021, c. 215,
§3, is amended by enacting a new subparagraph (6-A) to read:
(6-A) Distributing, as described in section 13155, subsection 5, the funds to
municipalities and unorganized territories to be used for the purposes of
maintaining ATV trails located within those municipalities and unorganized
territories;
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §13155, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2021, c. 215, §7 and affected
by §15, is further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
Thirty-seven dollars of each fee collected pursuant to this subsection must be deposited in
the ATV Recreational Management Fund established in section 1893, subsection 2 and
must be used to maintain designated state-approved ATV trails, except that 20% of the
funds deposited pursuant to this paragraph must be annually distributed to the municipality
of the ATV owner's residence as shown on the owner's registration certificate, or, if the
owner's residence as shown on the certificate is within unorganized territory, to the
unorganized territory fund of the county of the owner's residence established in Title 30-A,
section 7502, to be used for the purposes described in section 1893, subsection 2, paragraph
A, subparagraph (6-A).